Mississippi, session 2026, SB2200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-27-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-27-1.  (1)  The practice of podiatric medicine is that profession concerned with the prevention, examination, diagnosis and medical, surgical and adjuvant treatment of conditions of the human foot and ankle, and their governing and related structures, including the muscles or tendons of the lower leg governing the functions of the foot and ankle, including soft tissue up to the tibial tubercle/tuberosity. * * *  For the purposes of this chapter, "foot" means that part of the human anatomy which consists of the tarsal bones, metatarsal bones and phalanges. (2)  For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein: (a)  "Ankle" consists of the ankle joint which consists of the distal third of the tibia and fibula and their articulations with the talus and the soft tissue structures surrounding the foot and ankle. (b)  "Board" means the Mississippi State Board of Medical Licensure. (c)  "Physician" means any person with a valid doctor of medicine, doctor of osteopathy or doctor of podiatric medicine. ( * * *23)  A podiatrist is a * * * medical care provider physician who engages in the practice of podiatric medicine. ( * * *34)  A podiatrist may prescribe and administer drugs and tests, excluding general and spinal anesthesia, that are essential to the practice of podiatric medicine when used for or in connection with treatment of disorders of the human foot and ankle, and their governing and related structures, including the muscles or tendons of the lower leg governing the functions of the foot and ankle and soft tissue up to the tibial tubercle/tuberosity. A podiatrist properly licensed in this state may perform conservative and surgical treatments of the foot and ankle and governing and related structures, including the muscles or tendons of the lower leg governing the functions of the foot and ankle and soft tissue up to the tibial tubercle/tuberosity, when that podiatrist has completed training determined to be sufficient by the board at a program accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting association acceptable by the board. Implementation of the provisions of this subsection (4) shall be made pursuant to rules promulgated by the board, which are predicated on the education or level of training, or both, of an applicant. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.